
F10034

DI8FZ−01

F02201
N09214 F05476

Check Connector
E

1

Tc

DLC3Tc

CG

−DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−31

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM793E)

PRE−CHECK
1. DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM
(a) Check the warning lights and buzzer.

(1) Release parking brake lever.
(2) When the ignition switch is turned ON, check that

t h e ABS, VSC TRC and BRAKE war n ing light s,
VSC OFF, SLIP and ACTIVE TRC indicator lights
goes on for 3 sec.

(3) When depressing the brake pedal repeatedly it may
turn on the warning lights and buzzer.

HINT:
S If the ECU stores DTC, VSC TRC warning light and VSC

OFF indicator light is ON.
S If the indicator check result is not normal, proceed to trou-

bleshooting for the ABS warning light circuit, VSC TRC
warning light circuit, BRAKE warning light circuit, VSC
OFF indicator light circuit, SLIP indicator light circuit and
ACTIVE TRC indicator light circuit.

Trouble Area See Page

ABS warning light circuit �

VSC TRC warning light circuit �

BRAKE warning light circuit �

VSC OFF indicator light circuit �

SLIP indicator light circuit �

ACTIVE TRC indicator light circuit �

� : Refer LAND CRUISER Chassis and Body Repair Manual
(Pub. No. RM731E).

(b) In case of not using hand−held tester:
Check the DTC.
(1) Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E

1 
of check

connector or Tc and CG of DLC3.
SST 09843−18020 or 09843−18040
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Read the DTC from the ABS or VSC TRC warning

light on the combination meter.
HINT:
S If nocodeappears, inspect theTccircuit,ABSorVSC

TRC warning light circuit.

Trouble Area See page

Tc circuit DI−53

ABS warning light circuit �

VSC TRC warning light circuit �

� :ReferLANDCRUISERChassisandBodyRepairManual
(Pub. No. RM731E).
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Code 11 and 21

4 sec.
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2.5 sec.

Code 11 Code 21
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S As an example, the blinking patterns for normal code and
codes 11 and 21 are shown on the left.
(4) Codes are explained in the code table on page

DI−42.
(5) After completing the check, disconnect terminals Tc

andE
1

ofcheckconnectorand turnoff thedisplay.
If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time the low-
est numbered DTC will be displayed 1st.

(c) Incaseofusinghand −held tester:
Check the DTC.
(1)Hookup thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(2)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
(3) Read the DTC by following the prompts on the tes-

ter screen.
HINT:
Please refer to thehand −held testeroperator’smanual for fur-
ther details.
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(d) Incaseofnotusinghand −held tester:
Clear the DTC.
(1)UsingSST,connect terminalsTcandE

1
ofcheck

connector or Tc and CG of DLC3.
SST09843 −18020or09843 −18040
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Clear the DTC stored in ECU by depressing the

brake pedal 8 or more times within 5 sec.
(4) Check that the warning light shows the normal

code.
(5) Remove the SST from the terminals of check con-

nector or DLC3.
SST09843 −18020or09843 −18040

(e) Incaseofusinghand −held tester:
Clear the DTC.
(1)Hookup thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(2)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
(3)Operate thehand −held tester toerase thecodes

(Seehand −held testeroperator’smanual.).

(f) Reference:
Usingbreak −out−boxandhand −held tester,measure the
ECU terminal values.
(1) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(2)Hookup thebreak −out−boxandhand −held tester

to the vehicle.
(3) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(4) Read the ECU input/output values by following the

prompts on the tester screen.
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HINT:
S Hand−held testerhasa ”Snapshot” function.This records

the measured values and is effective in the diagnosis of
intermittent problems.

S Please refer to thehand −held tester/break −out−boxop-
erator’s manual for further details.

2. SPEED SENSOR SIGNAL CHECK (TEST MODE)
HINT:
If the ignition switch is turned from ON to ACC or LOCK during
test mode, DTC will be erased.
(a) Incaseofnotusinghand −held tester:

Check the speed sensor signal.
(1) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(2)UsingSST,connect terminalsTsandE

1
ofcheck

connector.
SST09843 −18020
(3) Start the engine.

(4) Check that the ABS warning light blinks.
HINT:
If the ABS warning light does not blink, inspect the ABS warning
light circuit and Ts circuit (See Pub. No. RM731E on page
DI−133andDI −165).

(5) Keep the vehicle in the stationary condition on the
flat place for 6 sec. or more.

(6) Shift the transfer lever in L4 position and turn the
center diff. lock switch ON.

(7) Shift the transfer lever back.
(8) Leaving the vehicle in the stationary condition and

the brake pedal in free condition for 1 sec. or more,
continue to depress the brake pedal with 98 N (10
kgf, 22 lbf) of force or more for 1 sec. or more.

(9) Leaving the vehicle in the stationary condition, de-
press the brake pedal with 980 N (100 kgf, 221 lbf)
of force or more quickly.

HINT:
At this time, the ABS warning light comes on for 3 sec.
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Malfunction Code (Example Code 72, 76)

7 2 67

ON
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Repeat
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(10) Drive vehicle straight forward.
When driving the vehicle with the speed faster than
45 km/h (28 mph) for several seconds, check that
the ABS warning light comes off.

HINT:
There is a case that the sensor check is not completed if the ve-
hicle has its rear wheels spun or its steering wheel steered dur-
ing this check.

(11) Stop the vehicle.
(12) Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E1 of check

connector or Tc and CG of DLC3.
SST 09843−18020 or 09843−18040
(13) Read the number of blinks of the ABS warning light.

HINT:
S See the list of DTC shown on the next page.
S If every sensor is normal, a normal code is output (A cycle

of 0.25 sec. ON and 0.25 sec. OFF is repeated).
S If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time,

the lowest numbered code will be displayed 1st.

(14) After doing the check, disconnect the SST from ter-
minals of check connector or terminals of check
connector and DLC3 and turn ignition switch OFF.

SST 09843−18020 or 09843−18040
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(b) In case of using hand−held tester:
Check the sensor signal.
(1) Hook up the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(2) Do step (3) and (5) to (10) on the previous page.
(3) Read the DTC by following the prompts on the tes-

ter screen.
HINT:
Please refer to the hand−held tester operator’s manual for fur-
ther details.

DTC of speed sensor check function:

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area

C1271 / 71 Low output voltage of right front speed sensor
SRight front speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1272 / 72 Low output voltage of left front speed sensor
SLeft front speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1273 / 73 Low output voltage of right rear speed sensor
SRight rear speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1274 / 74 Low output voltage of left rear speed sensor
SLeft rear speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1275 / 75
Abnormal change in output voltage of right front speed
sensor

Right front speed sensor rotor

C1276 / 76
Abnormal change in output voltage of left front speed
sensor

Left front speed sensor rotor

C1277 / 77
Abnormal change in output voltage of right rear speed
sensor

Right rear speed sensor rotor

C1278 / 78
Abnormal change in output voltage of left rear speed
sensor

Left rear speed sensor rotor

C1279 / 79 Deceleration sensor is faulty
SDeceleration sensor
SSensor installation

C1281 / 81 Master cylinder pressure sensor output signal is faulty Master cylinder pressure sensor

C1282 / 82 Transfer indicator (center diff. lock) switch malfunction Transfer indicator (center diff. lock) switch

C1283 / 83 Transfer L4 position switch malfunction Transfer L4 position switch
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3. In case of not using hand−held tester:
VSC SENSOR CHECK (TEST MODE)

NOTICE:
When having replaced the yaw rate sensor, deceleration
sensor and/or ECU, perform zero point calibration of the
yaw rate and deceleration sensors (See step 7.).
HINT:
If the ignition switch is turned from ON to ACC or LOCK during
test mode, DTC will be erased.

(a) Procedures for test mode:
(1) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(2) Check that the shift lever position is at P position,

turn the steering wheel to the neutral position.
(3) Using SST, connect terminals Ts and E1 of check

connector.
SST 09843−18020
(4) Start the engine.

(5) Check that the VSC TRC warning light blinks.
HINT:
If the VSC TRC warning light does not blink, inspect the VSC
TRC warning light circuit and Ts terminal circuit (See Pub. No.
RM731E on page DI−138 and DI−165).
(b) Check the steering angle sensor.

Turn the steering wheel either to left or right for 450˚ or
more from the vehicle stationary condition, and turn back
the steering wheel to the straight ahead position.

(c) Check the yaw rate sensor.
Shift the shift lever to the D position and drive the vehicle
at the vehicle speed of approx. 5 km/h (3 mph), turn the
steering wheel either to left or right for 90˚ or more, and
maintain 180˚ circular drive for the vehicle.

Stop the vehicle and shift the shift lever to the P
position, check that the VSC buzzer sounds for 3
sec.

If the VSC buzzer sounded, the sensor check is in normal
completion.
If the VSC buzzer does not sound, do the sensor check again.
If the VSC buzzer still won’t sound, there is malfunction in the
VSC sensor, so check the DTC.
HINT:
S Drive the vehicle circularly by 180˚. At the end of the turn,

the direction of the vehicle should be within 180˚± 5˚ of
its start position.

S Do not spin the wheels.



Malfunction Code (Example Code 71, 72)

ON

OFF

0.5 sec.

0.5 sec.

1.5 sec.

2.5 sec.

4 sec.
Repeat

71 72

A05868

DLC3

Hand−held
Tester

DLC3

Hand−held
Tester

LHD:

RHD:

DI−38 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM793E)

(d) Read the DTC.
(1) Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E1 of check

connector or Tc and CG of DLC3.
SST 09843−18020 or 09843−18040
(2) Read the number of blinks of the VSC TRC warning

light.
HINT:
S See the list of DTC shown on the next page.
S If every sensor is normal, a normal code is output. (A cycle

of 0.25 sec. ON and 0.25 sec. OFF is repeated.)
S If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time,

the lowest numbered code will be displayed 1st.

(3) After doing the check, disconnect the SST from ter-
minals of check connector or terminals of check
connector and DLC3 and turn ignition switch OFF.

SST 09843−18020 or 09843−18040

4. In case of using hand−held tester:
CHECK VSC SENSOR SIGNAL

NOTICE:
When having replaced the yaw rate sensor, deceleration
sensor and/or ECU, perform zero point calibration of the
yaw rate and deceleration sensors (See step 7.). Make sure
that this operation should be done before starting the fol-
lowing.
(a) Hook up the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Do steps (a)−(2), (4) and (b) to (c) on the previous page.
(c) Read the DTC by following the prompts on the tester

screen.
HINT:
Please refer to the hand−held tester operator’s manual for fur-
ther details.
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DTC of the VSC sensor check function:

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area

C0371 / 71 Yaw rate sensor output signal malfunction
SYaw rate sensor
SYaw rate sensor circuit

C1208 / 72 Steering position sensor output signal malfunction
SSteering position sensor
SSteering position sensor circuit

5. DECELERATION SENSOR OPERATION DIAGNOSIS
SYSTEM

CAUTION:
While checking the deceleration sensor operating diagno-
sis system, ABS does not work and brake system works as
a conventional brake system.

6. DECELERATION SENSOR CHECK
(a) Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.
(b) Connect VGS terminal to the batteries’ positive (+) termi-

nal, and GGND terminal to the batteries’ negative (−) ter-
minal, apply about 4.5 V between VGS and GGND termi-
nals.

NOTICE:
Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VGS and
GGND.
(c) Check the output voltage of GL1 and GL2 terminals.

Symbols Condition Standard Value

GL1 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL1 Lean forward 0.4 V − about 2.3 V

GL1 Lean rearward About 2.3 V − 4.1 V

GL2 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL2 Lean forward About 2.3 V − 4.1 V

GL2 Lean rearward 0.4 V − about 2.3 V

HINT:
S If the sensor is tilted too much it may show the wrong val-

ue.
S If dropped, the sensor should be replaced with a new one.
S The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be

placed upside down.
(d) When replacing the deceleration sensor:

Perform the deceleration sensor zero point calibration.
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7. IF NECESSARY, PERFORM ZERO POINT CALIBRA-
TION OF YAW RATE AND DECELERATION SENSORS

HINT:
S When having replaced the yaw rate sensor, deceleration

sensor or/and the ECU, make sure to perform yaw rate
and deceleration sensors zero point calibration.

S This operation is also required when the deceleration
sensor or yaw rate sensor has been replaced since the
calibrated zero point of both sensors will be erased.

NOTICE:
S While obtaining the zero point, do not give any vibra-

tion to the vehicle by tilting, moving or shaking it and
keep it in a stationary condition. (Do not start the en-
gine.)

S Be sure to do this on a level surface (within an inclina-
tion of 1 %).

(a) Clear the zero point of the yaw rate and deceleration sen-
sors.
(1) Shift the shift lever to P range.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON in a stationary condition.
(3) With the ignition switch ON, using SST, repeat a

cycle of short and open between terminals Ts and
E1 of check connector 4 times or more within 8 sec.
Check that the VSC warning light is lit indicating the
recorded zero point is erased.

SST 09843−18020
(4) Turn the ignition switch OFF.

(b) Obtain zero point of the yaw rate sensor.
(1) Make the terminals Ts and E1 of check connector

disconnected.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.

HINT:
The vehicle should be in a stationary condition with the shift le-
ver in P range.

(3) Check that the lighted VSC warning light goes off
about 15 sec. after the ignition switch is turned ON.

HINT:
Even if the ignition is not turned OFF in step (a)−(4) and remains
ON, the yaw rate sensor zero point calibration can be com-
pleted. In this case, the VSC warning light is lit about 15 sec.
and starts blinking. (Normal code)

(4) After ensuring that the VSC warning light remains
OFF for 2 sec., turn the ignition switch OFF.

HINT:
If the ignition switch is not turned OFF in step (a)−(4), ensure
the blinking light for 2 sec. and turn the ignition switch OFF.
(c) Perform deceleration sensor zero point calibration.
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NOTICE:
After step (b) (the yaw rate sensor zero point calibration),
the VSC warning light goes off. At this time, if the vehicle
is driven without performing step (c) (deceleration sensor
zero point calibration), deceleration sensor zero point cal-
ibration malfunction will be detected and the VSC warning
light will light up. Therefore, perform step (c) right after step
(b).

(1) Using SST, connect the terminals Ts and E1 of
check connector.

SST 09843−18020
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.

HINT:
Make the vehicle in a stationary condition with the shift lever in
P range.

(3) After turning the ignition switch ON, check that the
VSC warning light is lit for about 4 sec. and then
starts quick blinking at 0.13 sec. intervals.

(4) After ensuring the blinking of the VSC warning light
for 2 sec., turn the ignition switch OFF.

(5) Remove the SST and make the terminals Ts and E1
of check connector disconnected.

SST 09843−18020


